Hawaii statutes.
§571-5 Board of family court judges. A
board of family court judges, which shall consist of all the State's family
court judges and district family judges is hereby created. The board shall
annually elect from among its members a chairperson who shall preside at
meetings of the board. The chairperson shall have no other authority not
specifically authorized under this chapter, or any applicable rule of the
supreme court, or specifically delegated by a majority of the board. The board
shall meet at stated times to be fixed by it but not less often than once every
six months, and on call of the chairperson.

The board shall discuss and shall attempt to
achieve agreement upon general policies for the conduct of the family courts
and forms for use in such courts. The board shall recommend, for adoption by
the supreme court, rules of court governing procedure and practices in such
courts. The board shall provide the guidelines and procedures necessary to
implement a single statewide standardized tool to conduct risk and needs
assessments and validation of the tool every five years. The board may, within
the limitations of the facilities available to the family courts of the State,
seek the consolidation of the statistical and other data on the work and services
of such courts and research studies that may be made of the problems of
families and children dealt with by such courts to the end that the treatment
of children and families subject to the jurisdiction of such courts shall
achieve the highest possible degree of uniformity throughout the State and to
the further end that knowledge of treatment, methods and therapeutic practices
be shared among such courts. The board may also formulate recommendations for
remedial legislation. All actions by the board shall be subject to the
regulatory supervision of the chief justice of the supreme court. [L 1965, c
232, pt of §1; Supp, §333-5; HRS §571-5; am L 1973, c 211, §1(b) and c 219, §3;
gen ch 1993; am L 2014, c 201, §7]

Note

The 2014 amendment applies to delinquent behavior committed
on or after July 1, 2014. L 2014, c 201, §21.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next